Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Chapter 03. Scope of Code.

Collateral references. —

43 Am. Jur. 2d, Insurance, §§ 23-65.

44 C.J.S., Insurance, §§ 3-22.

Sec. 21.03.010.
Insurance regulated.

All persons transacting a business of insurance in this state, or relative to a subject resident, located or to be performed in this state, shall comply with the applicable provisions of this title.

Foreign and alien insurers doing business as authorized insurers under this title are not subject to AS 10.06 (Alaska Corporations Code).

A person who transacts insurance in this state, or relative to a subject resident, located, or to be performed in this state as or on behalf of a risk retention group or purchasing group formed under and in compliance with 15 U.S.C. 3901 — 3906 (Liability Risk Retention Act), shall comply with the provisions of this title not preempted by federal law.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 3 ch 62 SLA 1995)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1988 “AS 10.06 (Alaska Corporations Code)” was substituted for “the Alaska Business Corporation Act (AS 10.05)” to conform to the enactment of AS 10.06 and the repeal of AS 10.05 by ch. 166, SLA 1988.

Administrative Code. —

For risk retention groups, see 3 AAC 24, art. 1.

For purchasing groups, see 3 AAC 24, art. 2.

For unfair claims settlement acts or practices, see 3 AAC 26, art. 1.

Sec. 21.03.020.
Application of Code as to particular types of insurers. [Repealed, §
2 ch 234 SLA 1968.]

Sec. 21.03.021.
Application of title.

In addition to the exclusion contained in AS

21.03.070

, this title does not apply to a life insurance or annuity company organized and operated without profit to any private shareholder or individual exclusively for the purpose of aiding and strengthening educational institutions by issuing insurance and annuity contracts only to or for the benefit of the institutions and individuals engaged in the service of these institutions; however, all policies and contracts issued by such an organization must provide for acceptance of service of process within this state.

Except as otherwise provided in this title, a person that provides coverage for the cost of medical care in this state is subject to this title unless the person shows that, while providing coverage for medical care, the person is subject to the jurisdiction of another agency of this state or of the federal government by providing the director with the appropriate certificate, license, or other document issued by the other governmental agency that permits or qualifies the person to provide coverage for medical care.

A person described under (b) of this section who is unable to show that the person is subject to the jurisdiction of another governmental agency under (b) of this section and who has not received a certificate of authority under AS 21.85

is subject to all appropriate provisions of this title regarding the conduct of the person’s business; and

shall submit to an examination by the director to determine the organization and solvency of the person and to determine whether the person complies with this title.

A person that advertises, administers, sells, or transacts the coverage of medical care under (b) of this section and is required to submit to an examination by the director under (c)(2) of this section shall advise every purchaser, prospective purchaser, or covered person that the person’s coverage may not be regulated under Alaska insurance law and may not be covered by the Alaska Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Association under AS 21.79.

This title does not apply to a service contract offered, issued for delivery, delivered, or renewed in this state. In this subsection, “service contract”

means a service contract or agreement for a separate or additional consideration, for a specific duration, to

maintain, service, repair, or replace tangible personal property, or to indemnify for repair, replacement, or maintenance, for an operational or structural failure due to a defect in materials or workmanship or normal wear and tear, with or without additional provision for incidental indemnity payments when service, repair, or replacement is not reasonably or commercially feasible;

repair, replace, or maintain tangible personal property damaged as a result of power surges or as a result of accidental damage from the handling of property; or

repair, replace, or maintain household consumer goods, household appliances, and household systems, including damage resulting from operational or structural failure due to a defect in materials or workmanship or normal wear and tear;

does not include

mechanical breakdown insurance;

a contract that requires an indemnity payment for each incident, and the payment exceeds the purchase price of the property serviced;

a home warranty; in this subparagraph, “home warranty” means a warranty that covers the entire home and does not include a warranty limited to a household system or appliance; or

portable electronics insurance as defined in AS

21.36.515

.

If an insurer is not required to obtain a certificate of authority in this state under AS

21.09.020

(5), the provisions of this title do not apply to policies or contracts issued by the insurer.

This title does not apply to a portable electronics manufacturer’s warranty or extended warranty.

A motor vehicle service contract shall be governed by AS

21.59.110

—

21.59.290

except as expressly provided in this title.

A motor vehicle warranty, motor vehicle maintenance agreement, and motor vehicle service contract offered for sale or sold to a person other than a consumer are not insurance and do not have to comply with any provision of this title. In this subsection, “motor vehicle maintenance agreement” means a contract of limited duration that provides for regular maintenance only.

This title does not apply to the solicitation of an agreement or an agreement between a prospective recipient of ambulance, emergency, or fire protection services and a municipality or community-based nonprofit that provides ambulance, emergency, or fire protection services.

This title does not apply to a health care sharing ministry. In this subsection, “health care sharing ministry” means an organization that

is described in 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3) and exempt from taxation under 26 U.S.C. 501(a);

is faith-based and whose participants share

a common set of ethical or religious beliefs; and

medical expenses among participants in accordance with the common set of ethical or religious beliefs;

coordinates financial sharing of medical expenses among willing participants in the organization according to criteria established by the organization;

provides assistance for the financial or medical needs of a participant through contributions from one participant to another;

provides the amounts of assistance that participants may contribute without an assumption of risk or promise to pay by the participants or the organization;

provides to all participants written monthly statements that list the total dollar amount of qualified needs submitted to the organization by participants for contribution;

provides for an annual audit by an independent certified public accountant in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and makes the annual audit available to the public upon request; and

provides a written disclaimer on or accompanying all applications and guideline materials distributed by or on behalf of the organization that reads in substance: “Notice: The organization coordinating the sharing of medical expenses is not an insurance company, and neither its guidelines nor plan of operation is an insurance policy. Whether anyone chooses to assist you with your medical bills will be totally voluntary because no other participant will be compelled by law to contribute toward your medical bills. Participation in the organization or a subscription to any of its documents should never be considered to be insurance. Regardless of whether you receive a payment for medical expenses or whether this organization continues to operate, you are always personally responsible for the payment of your own medical bills.”

History.

(§ 3 ch 234 SLA 1968; am § 2 ch 73 SLA 2001; am § 1 ch 38 SLA 2002; am § 1 ch 143 SLA 2003; am § 1 ch 23 SLA 2011; am §§ 1, 2 ch 25 SLA 2013; am §§ 1, 2 ch 78 SLA 2014; am § 1 ch 84 SLA 2014; am § 1 ch 46 SLA 2016)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (j) was enacted as (h); relettered in 2014.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective January 1, 2014, in (e)(1)(B), deleted “damaged by power surges” following “handling of property”; added (e)(2)(E); added (g); and made related changes.

The first 2014 amendment, effective January 1, 2015, deleted (e)(2)(C), which read, “a contract to provide service on a motor vehicle subject to registration under AS

28.10.011

”; added (h) and (i), and made related changes.

The second 2014 amendment, effective October 14, 2014, added (h) [now (j)].

The 2016 amendment, effective October 18, 2016, added (k).

Secs. 21.03.030 — 21.03.050.
Existing certificates of authority and licenses; existing forms and filings; existing domestic insurers. [Repealed, § 47 ch 29 SLA 1987.]

Sec. 21.03.060.
Preemption.

The state hereby preempts the field of regulating insurers and their managing general agents, insurance producers, and representatives. All political subdivisions of the state, including home rule boroughs or cities, are prohibited from requiring of an insurer, managing general agent, insurance producer, or representative regulated under this title an authorization, permit, or registration of any kind for conducting transactions lawful under the authority granted by the state under this title.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 4 ch 62 SLA 1995)

Sec. 21.03.070.
Exemption for qualified charitable gift annuities.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, the issuance of a qualified charitable gift annuity does not constitute engaging in the business of insurance in this state, and, except as provided by this section, is exempt from regulation by the division under this title.

When entering into an agreement for a qualified charitable gift annuity, the charitable organization shall set out in writing in the agreement that

a qualified charitable gift annuity is not an insurance policy in this state, is not subject to regulation by the division, and is not protected by the Alaska Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Association established under AS

21.79.040

or any other association that guarantees payment under a policy of insurance; and

the state does not in any way approve or endorse the annuity.

The notice required by (b) of this section must be in bold type and be contained in a separate paragraph, and the print size of the notice must be larger than the print size generally used in the annuity agreement.

A charitable organization that issues its first qualified charitable gift annuity on or after October 1, 2001 shall notify the division in writing within 90 days after the issuance. The notice

shall be signed by an officer or director of the charitable organization;

must provide the name and address of the charitable organization; and

must certify that

the charitable organization is a charitable organization; and

the charitable gift annuities issued by the charitable organization are qualified charitable gift annuities.

Except for the information required by (d) of this section, a charitable organization is not required to submit information to the division unless the division determines additional information is necessary to determine an appropriate fine under (g) of this section.

If a charitable organization fails to comply with the notice requirements under (b), (c), or (d) of this section, the qualified charitable gift annuity issued by the charitable organization still receives the exemption for a qualified charitable gift annuity provided by (a) of this section.

The division may enforce performance with the notice requirements under (b), (c), or (d) of this section by sending a letter by certified mail, return receipt requested, demanding that the charitable organization comply with the requirements. The division may impose a civil penalty on the charitable organization in an amount not to exceed $1,000 for each qualified charitable gift annuity issued by the charitable organization until the charitable organization complies with the requirements.

In this section,

“charitable gift annuity” means a transfer of money or other property by a person to a charitable organization in return for the charitable organization’s providing an annuity to the person that is payable over one or two lives and under which the

actuarial value of the annuity is less than the value of the money or other property transferred; and

difference in value constitutes a charitable deduction for federal income tax purposes;

“charitable organization” means a person identified

in the definition of “charitable contribution” in 26 U.S.C. 170(c) as a person to whom or for whose use a contribution or gift is made; or

as an exempt organization under 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3);

“qualified charitable gift annuity” means an annuity described in 26 U.S.C. 501(m)(5) and 26 U.S.C. 514(c)(5), if the annuity is issued by a charitable organization that on the date of the issuance has

a minimum of

a guarantee that the obligations of the annuity contract will be met by a charitable organization that meets the requirements of (A) of this paragraph.

$300,000 in unrestricted cash, in cash equivalents, or in publicly traded securities, exclusive of the assets funding the annuity; and

(ii)

three years of continuous operation or is a successor or affiliate of a charitable organization that has been in continuous operation for at least three years; or

History.

(§ 3 ch 73 SLA 2001)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 4(a), ch. 73, SLA 2001, provides that, in addition to a qualified charitable gift annuity established on or after October 1, 2001, the provisions of subsection (a) apply to a charitable gift annuity that is issued before October 1, 2001, and that is in effect on that date.